src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx
burleeske+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:burle ESKE_LOAN ;
eksteerne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ekste ERNE_LOAN ;
eksterijööre+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:eksteri JÖÖRE ;
feltspaate+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:felt^spa AATE_LOAN ;
frïjjestijle+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:frïjje#st IJLE_LOAN_N ;
gendaarme+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:genda ARME_LOAN ;
gïehtjedimmieprosjekte+N+Sem/Act:gïehtjedimmie#prosj EKTE_LOAN ;
gratijaale+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:grati IJAALE_LOAN ;
gresskaare+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:gresska AARE_LOAN ;
hilladioksijde+N+Sem/Dummytag:hilla#di^oks IJDE_LOAN ;
homofovbe+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:homof OVBE_LOAN ;
hydrofovbe+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hydrof OVBE_LOAN ;
identiteete+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Feat:identite EETE_LOAN ;
instruktööre+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:in^strukt ÖÖRE_LOAN ;
interijööre+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:interi JÖÖRE ;
japaane+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:japa AANE_LOAN ;
jöödeparagraafe+N+Sem/Dummytag:jööde#paragra GRAAFE_LOAN ;
klimatolååge+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:klimatol LÅÅGE_LOAN ;
kolombijaane+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:kolombi IJAANE_LOAN ;
kolportaasje+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kolporta ASJE_LOAN ;
konseerte+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Event:konse ERTE_LOAN ;
konseerve+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/State:konse ERVE_LOAN ;
korporaale+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:korpora AALE_LOAN ;
krokodillefaarme+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:krokodille#fa ARME_LOAN ;
kulloksijde+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kulloks IJDE_LOAN ;
kuveerte+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kuve ERTE_LOAN ;
lanteerne+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:lante ERNE_LOAN ;
lisensijaate+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:lisensi IJAATE_LOAN ;
maabpesysteeme+N+Sem/Dummytag:maabpe#syste EEME_LOAN ; ! https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Stáda_almmolaš_hálddašeapmi:mappesystemhttps://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Stáda_almmolaš_hálddašeapmi:mappesystem_1
maanaj-TV-kanaale+N+Sem/Plc-abstr:maanaj-TV- KANAALE_LOAN ;
materijaale+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Mat:materi IJAALE_LOAN ;
matrijaarke+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:matri IJARKE_LOAN ;
medijume+N+Sem/Dummytag:medi JUME ;
meksikaane+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:meksika AANE_LOAN ;
nepaleese+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:nepale EESE_LOAN ;
nitraate+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:nitra AATE_LOAN ;
nyjsenæjjanprofijle+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:nyjsenæjjan#prof IJLE_LOAN_N ;
olympijaade+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:olympi IJAADE_LOAN ;
ööhpehtimmieprogramme+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ööhpehtimmie#prov^gram GRAMME_LOAN ;
ööhpehtimmieprosjekte+N+Sem/Act:ööhpehtimmie#prosj EKTE_LOAN ;
oratorijume+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:oratori JUME ;
paleograafe+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:paleo^gra GRAAFE_LOAN ;
patrijaarke+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:patri IJARKE_LOAN ;
prijoriteete+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Semcon:prijorite EETE_LOAN ;
proletarijaate+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:proletari IJAATE_LOAN ;
promenaade+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:promena AADE_LOAN ;
psittakovse+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:psittako OVSE_LOAN ;
repertoaare+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:reperto^a AARE_LOAN ;
saabate+N+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:saabat X_NIEJTEnotODD ;
saerniekanaale+N+Sem/Plc-abstr_Route:saernie# KANAALE_LOAN ;
nuhtjieseabradahke:nuhtjie# SEABRADAHKE ;
sjånglööre+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Hum:sjångl ÖÖRE_LOAN ;
skaarve+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ska ARVE_LOAN ;
skiktje+N+Sem/Dummytag:skiktj NIEJTE ;
tjaktjefestivaale+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Event:tjaktje#festiva AALE_LOAN ; ! NB!legg til +Use/NotDNorm i lexiconet
trikotaasje+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:trikota ASJE_LOAN ;
ufolååge+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ufol LÅÅGE_LOAN ;
vaakte+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:va AKTE_LOAN ;
viermehke+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:viermehk N_ODDonlyDIFT ;
viktorijaane+N+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:viktori IJAANE_LOAN ;
